Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-540
Sanitary district; activities; discontinuance; effect on power to levy taxes.

Except as otherwise provided in section 31-543, for the purpose of discharging obligations of such district incurred prior to the discontinuance of its activities and work as provided in sections 31-501 to 31-534, such district shall continue to have the power to levy taxes as provided in such sections, and thereafter the district shall have the power to levy and collect general taxes in an amount not to exceed one and seven-tenths cents on each one hundred dollars upon the taxable value of all the taxable property in such district and shall have the power to levy special assessments in the manner and to the extent previously vested in such district.

Laws 1941, c. 56, § 5, p. 256;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 31-634;

R.S.1943, § 31-540;

Laws 1953, c. 287, § 52, p. 961;

Laws 1979, LB 187, § 138;

Laws 1992, LB 719A, § 125;

Laws 2022, LB800, § 334.